Missouri, session 2026, HB2075.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 8, 171, and 173, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto three
new sections, to be known as sections 8.1000, 171.422, and 173.1422, to read as follows:
8.1000. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Biological sex", as such term is defined in section 191.1720;
(2) "Family facility", a family restroom or shower room that does not have more
than one toilet or shower;
(3) "Gender", as such term is defined in section 191.1720;
(4) "Multi-occupancy facility", a restroom, locker room, changing room, or
shower room that is accessible to multiple individuals at the same time. "Multi-
occupancy facility" shall not include a family facility;
(5) "Public building", any building owned by the state or any department,
division, agency, or commission thereof, and any building operated by an entity that
receives state funds;
(6) "Single-occupancy facility", a restroom, locker room, changing room, or
shower room that is accessible only to a single individual at the same time. "Single-
occupancy facility" may include a family facility.
2. (1) An entity operating a public building shall designate with clear signage
each multi-occupancy facility that is accessible by multiple persons at the same time for
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2075 2
the exclusive use of persons of the male biological sex only or for the exclusive use of
persons of the female biological sex only.
(2) An entity operating a public building shall not permit a member of the
female biological sex to use a multi-occupancy facility that has been designated by the
public building for the exclusive use of persons of the male biological sex only.
(3) An entity operating a public building shall not permit a member of the male
biological sex to use a multi-occupancy facility that has been designated by the public
building for the exclusive use of persons of the female biological sex only.
(4) An entity operating a public building shall not construct, establish, or
maintain a multi-occupancy facility that is designated for the use of persons of a gender
or genders instead of, or in addition to, being designated for the exclusive use of persons
of the male biological sex only or for the exclusive use of persons of the female biological
sex only. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit an entity operating a public
building from constructing, establishing, or maintaining a family facility.
(5) An entity operating a public building may designate a single-occupancy
facility as accessible to a person of either biological sex.
3. This section shall not be construed to prohibit an entity operating a public
building from adopting and enforcing a policy on the use of a multi-occupancy facility in
accordance with the provisions of this section. Any such policy shall provide an option
for alternative accommodations, including, but not limited to, the use of single-
occupancy facilities, upon the request of a person due to special circumstances.
4. Subsection 2 of this section shall not apply to any of the following:
(1) A child under ten years of age who is being assisted by a parent, legal
guardian, or family member, as well as the parent, legal guardian, or family member
who is assisting such child;
(2) A person with a disability who is being assisted by another person, as well as
the person assisting such person with a disability;
(3) An employee of any department, division, agency, or commission of the state
whose job duties require the employee to enter a multi-occupancy facility that is
designated for a biological sex that differs from such employee's biological sex; or
(4) A person who enters a multi-occupancy facility that is designated for a
biological sex that differs from the person's biological sex because the person reasonably
believes he or she is responding to a legitimate emergency.
5. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall result in revocation
or withholding of state funding for the entity that operates the public building.
171.422. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Biological sex", as such term is defined in section 191.1720;

HB 2075 3
(2) "Family facility", a family restroom or shower room that does not have more
than one toilet or shower;
(3) "Gender", as such term is defined in section 191.1720;
(4) "Multi-occupancy facility", a restroom, locker room, changing room, or
shower room that is accessible to multiple individuals at the same time. "Multi-
occupancy facility" shall not include a family facility;
(5) "School", includes the following:
(a) Any charter school established pursuant to the provisions of sections 160.400
to 160.425;
(b) Any public school, as such term is defined in section 160.011; and
(c) Any school district, as such term is defined in section 160.011;
(6) "Single-occupancy facility", a restroom, locker room, changing room, or
shower room that is accessible only to a single individual at the same time. "Single-
occupancy facility" may include a family facility.
2. (1) A school shall designate with clear signage each multi-occupancy facility
that is accessible by multiple students at the same time, whether located in a school
building or in a facility used by the school for a school-sponsored activity, for the
exclusive use of students of the male biological sex only or for the exclusive use of
students of the female biological sex only.
(2) A school shall not permit a member of the female biological sex to use a
multi-occupancy facility that has been designated by the school for the exclusive use of
students of the male biological sex only.
(3) A school shall not permit a member of the male biological sex to use a multi-
occupancy facility that has been designated by the school for the exclusive use of
students of the female biological sex only.
(4) A school shall not construct, establish, or maintain a multi-occupancy facility
that is designated for the use of students of a gender or genders instead of, or in addition
to, being designated for the exclusive use of students of the male biological sex only or
for the exclusive use of students of the female biological sex only. This subdivision shall
not be construed to prohibit a school from constructing, establishing, or maintaining a
family facility.
(5) A school may designate a single-occupancy facility as accessible to a person of
either biological sex.
3. (1) A school shall not permit a member of the female biological sex to share
overnight accommodations with a member of the male biological sex in any setting
where students are required to stay overnight, including, but not limited to, any school
trip.

HB 2075 4
(2) A school shall not permit a member of the male biological sex to share
overnight accommodations with a member of the female biological sex in any setting
where students are required to stay overnight, including, but not limited to, any school
trip.
4. This section shall not be construed to prohibit a school from adopting and
enforcing a policy on the use of a multi-occupancy facility in accordance with the
provisions of this section. Any such policy shall provide an option for alternative
accommodations, including, but not limited to, the use of single-occupancy facilities or
faculty facilities, upon the request of a student due to special circumstances.
5. Subsections 2 and 3 of this section shall not apply to any of the following:
(1) A child under ten years of age who is being assisted by a parent, legal
guardian, or family member, as well as the parent, legal guardian, or family member
who is assisting such child;
(2) A person with a disability who is being assisted by another person, as well as
the person assisting such person with a disability;
(3) An employee of a school whose job duties require the employee to enter a
multi-occupancy facility that is designated for a biological sex that differs from such
employee's biological sex; or
(4) A person who enters a multi-occupancy facility that is designated for a
biological sex that differs from the person's biological sex because the person reasonably
believes he or she is responding to a legitimate emergency.
6. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall result in revocation
or withholding of state funding for the school.
173.1422. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Biological sex", as such term is defined in section 191.1720;
(2) "Family facility", a family restroom or shower room that does not have more
than one toilet or shower;
(3) "Gender", as such term is defined in section 191.1720;
(4) "Institution of higher education", any public institution of postsecondary
education or proprietary school in this state that is subject to the coordinating board for
higher education pursuant to section 173.005;
(5) "Multi-occupancy facility", a restroom, locker room, changing room, or
shower room that is accessible to multiple individuals at the same time. "Multi-
occupancy facility" shall not include a family facility;
(6) "Single-occupancy facility", a restroom, locker room, changing room, or
shower room that is accessible only to a single individual at the same time. "Single-
occupancy facility" may include a family facility.

HB 2075 5
2. (1) An institution of higher education shall designate with clear signage each
multi-occupancy facility accessible by multiple students at the same time, whether
located in a building of the institution or in a facility used by the institution for an
institution-sponsored activity, for the exclusive use of students of the male biological sex
only or for the exclusive use of students of the female biological sex only.
(2) An institution of higher education shall not permit a member of the female
biological sex to use a multi-occupancy facility that has been designated by the
institution of higher education for the exclusive use of students of the male biological sex
only.
(3) An institution of higher education shall not permit a member of the male
biological sex to use a multi-occupancy facility that has been designated by the
institution of higher education for the exclusive use of students of the female biological
sex only.
(4) An institution of higher education shall not construct, establish, or maintain
a multi-occupancy facility that is designated for the use of students of a gender or
genders instead of, or in addition to, being designated for the exclusive use of students of
the male biological sex only or for the exclusive use of students of the female biological
sex only. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit an institution of higher
education from constructing, establishing, or maintaining a family facility.
(5) An institution of higher education may designate a single-occupancy facility
as accessible to a person of either biological sex.
3. This section shall not be construed to prohibit an institution of higher
education from adopting and enforcing a policy on the use of a multi-occupancy facility
in accordance with the provisions of this section. Any such policy shall provide an
option for alternative accommodations, including, but not limited to, the use of single-
occupancy facilities or faculty facilities, upon the request of a student due to special
circumstances.
4. Subsection 2 of this section shall not apply to any of the following:
(1) A child under ten years of age who is being assisted by a parent, legal
guardian, or family member, as well as the parent, legal guardian, or family member
who is assisting such child;
(2) A person with a disability who is being assisted by another person, as well as
the person who is assisting such person with a disability;
(3) An employee of an institution of higher education whose job duties require
the employee to enter a multi-occupancy facility that is designated for a biological sex
that differs from such employee's biological sex; or

HB 2075 6
(4) A person who enters a multi-occupancy facility that is designated for a
biological sex that differs from the person's biological sex because the person reasonably
believes he or she is responding to a legitimate emergency.
5. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall result in revocation
or withholding of state funding for the institution of higher education.
✔